North Carolina, session 2025, HB1028.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160D-904 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-904. Airport zoning.
(a) Any local government may enact and enforce airport zoning regulations pursuant to
this Chapter or as authorized by Article 4 of Chapter 63 of the General Statutes.
G.S. 160D-601(d) shall not apply to airport zoning regulations.
(b) Airport zoning regulations for real property within 6 miles of any cargo airport
complex site subject to regulation by the North Carolina Global TransPark Authority are
governed by G.S. 63A-18."
SECTION 2. This act applies only to Harnett County.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1028-v-1*